Tennessee statutes. Title 64 Regional Authorities
Part 1 East Tennessee Regional Agribusiness Marketing Authority
64-10-111. Receipt of grants, appropriations and other contributions.

In addition to §64-10-110, the authority may receive grants, appropriations, other contributions of funds, and real or personal property, from the state of Tennessee, the federal government, any other governmental entity or any nonprofit organization, individuals, companies or corporations.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 12.

64-10-112. Conduct of financial affairs.

The financial affairs of the authority shall be conducted in accordance with state law and the procedures established by the comptroller of the treasury. The board may establish such bank accounts for the authority as the board deems appropriate and consistent with state law. The authority is authorized to invest any funds of the authority in any investment that would be an eligible investment of a county.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 13; 2011, ch. 419, § 6.

64-10-113. Annual audit.

The board of directors of the authority shall cause an annual audit to be made of the books and records of the authority. Within thirty (30) days after receipt by the authority, a copy of the annual audit shall be filed with the board, and if the department of audit has not prepared the audit, with the comptroller of the treasury or comptroller's designee. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for determining that such audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and that such audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The comptroller of the treasury shall prepare a uniform audit manual as is required to assure that the books and records are kept in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and that audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury are met.

These audits shall be prepared by certified public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the governing body of the authority shall fail or refuse to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant or direct the department of audit to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the authority.

The comptroller of the treasury is authorized to modify the requirements for an audit as set out in this section when the activity, in the comptroller of the treasury's judgment, is not sufficient to justify the expenses of a complete audit. Furthermore, the comptroller of the treasury is authorized to direct the department of audit to make an audit or financial review of the books and records of the authority.

The current operating financial statements of the authority, and any other pertinent information as required by the comptroller, or the comptroller's designee, shall be submitted annually with the copy of the annual audit, or upon request, to the comptroller, or the comptroller's designee.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 14; 2011, ch. 419, §§ 7, 8; 2014, ch. 619, § 1; 2018, ch. 495, § 9.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment substituted “shall prepare a uniform audit manual as is required” for “shall promulgate such rules and regulations as are required” in the last sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 495, § 11. February 22, 2018.

64-10-114. Obsolete or surplus property — Disposal.

The board may direct the disposal of the authority's obsolete or surplus property, except for land purchased under the state's grant agreement, contract number 100/005-01-91, executed May 23, 1991, and any improvements thereon, which shall immediately be offered, at no cost, to the state. Any disposal of interest in land or improvements to real property purchased pursuant to the above mentioned grant agreement shall receive prior approval of the state building commission. Such disposal shall comply with the general law applicable to counties' sound business practices.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 15.

64-10-115. County membership.

Any county in the East Tennessee grand division not a member of the authority may become a member by:

Notifying the board of its desire to become a member;

Adopting a resolution by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the county legislative body; and

Contributing funds in an amount to be determined by the board, which shall not exceed the highest contribution by any county already a member as adjusted for inflation or deflation by the consumer price index, all cities average, published by the United States department of labor.

Upon approval by the board and the county legislative body of the county seeking to become a member, the county shall become a member of the authority when the authority receives the necessary contribution. When a county is added as a member of the authority, the board shall cause the resolution of the county legislative body providing for addition of the county as a member of the authority to be filed with the secretary of state as an addendum. New members shall be entitled to membership on the board. The county mayor of any such county, or the county mayor's designee, shall become a member of the board for an initial term of office to be established by the board.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 16; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

64-10-116. Annual reports.

The board of directors of the authority shall report annually to the governing bodies of the various counties of the area. Such reports shall include a summary of all activities and accomplishments for the period, a copy of the annual audit prepared in accordance with §64-10-113, and the proposed plans for the next year.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 17.

64-10-117. Termination of East Tennessee agribusiness authority—Transfer of assets.

On the date the interlocal governmental cooperative agreement that established the East Tennessee agribusiness authority is completely terminated in accordance with such agreement and upon the approval of two-thirds (2/3) of such counties so terminating such interlocal governmental cooperative agreement that the assets belonging to the East Tennessee agribusiness authority be transferred to the East Tennessee regional agribusiness marketing authority created under this part, such assets shall be transferred to the East Tennessee regional agribusiness marketing authority. On such date the East Tennessee regional agribusiness marketing authority shall assume all debts of the East Tennessee agribusiness authority and the joint market project created under such interlocal cooperative agreement.

Acts 1998, ch. 998, § 18.

64-10-118. Condemnation of property for operation, improvement or expansion.

The authority may condemn in its own name any land, rights in land, easements, and/or rights-of-way that in the judgment of the wastewater board are necessary for the purposes of acquiring property for the operation, improvement and expansion of a system, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by persons having the power of eminent domain, or otherwise held or used for public purposes; provided, however, that such prior public use will not be interfered with by the use to which such property will be put by the authority; and provided further, that the exercise of eminent domain power shall be approved by a majority of those present and voting of the board of directors of the authority. Such power of condemnation may be exercised in the manner prescribed by any applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 9.

64-10-119. Tax exemption — Jurisdiction — Consent not required.

The authority, its properties at any time owned by it, and the income and revenues derived from such properties are exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation. Notwithstanding this subsection (a) and § 64-10-101(a), any property sold by the authority under a lease purchase agreement is not exempt from state, county, or municipal taxation. All bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by the authority and the income from such bonds, notes, and other obligations are exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer, and estate taxes, or except as otherwise provided by state law. Bonds issued by the authority are deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state.

Neither the Tennessee public utility commission nor any board or commission of like character hereafter created shall have jurisdiction over the authority in the management and control of a system, including the regulation of its rates, fees, tolls or charges; provided, however, that the authority is subject to regulation by the department of environment and conservation as a public sewerage system.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the authority may acquire, construct, improve and extend a system in the region served by the authority without the consent of any county, city or utility district.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 10; 2017, ch. 94, § 44; 2019, ch. 180, § 3.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b).

The 2019 amendment, in (a) added the second sentence and substituted “are” for “shall be” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 180, § 4. April 23, 2019.

64-10-120. Powers of county, city or utility district.

Any county, city or utility district may take all actions under this part by resolution of its governing body. Any county, city or utility district shall have all powers necessary in order to further the purposes of this part, including, without limitation, the power to sell, lease, dedicate, donate or otherwise convey to the authority any of its interest in any existing wastewater system, franchises, assets, liabilities or other related property, whether real or personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, and whether or not subject to mortgages, liens, charges or other encumbrances, or grant easements, license or other rights or privileges therein to the authority and to contract with the authority.

Any county, city or utility district may enter into agreements with the authority for the orderly transfer of all or any part of its system and to enter into agreement for the authority to assume, to pay or to refund bonds, notes or other obligations issued by a county, city or utility district entered into by the county, city or utility district to acquire, construct or equip all or any part of a system.

Any county, city or utility district is authorized to advance, donate or lend money to the authority and to provide that funds available to it for a system shall be paid to the authority.

Any county, city or utility district shall have the same right to enter into any agreement with the authority that the wastewater board deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this part as a county, city or utility district has to enter into similar agreements with wastewater treatment authorities as provided by title 68, chapter 221, part 6.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 11.

64-10-121. No restriction or limitation on powers of county, city or utility district — Powers cumulative and supplemental.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed as a restriction or a limitation upon any powers that a county, city or utility district might otherwise have under any laws of this state, but shall be construed as cumulative of and supplemental to any such powers. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required with respect to the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority or any instrument as security for the bonds, notes or other obligations except as provided in this part, any law to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to deprive the state and its governmental subdivisions of their respective police powers or to impair any power of any official or agency of the state and its governmental subdivisions that may be otherwise provided by law.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 12.

64-10-122. Authority to contract.

The authority is hereby authorized, whenever desirable by its board, to enter into contracts, agreements or other arrangements with any county, city or utility district regarding a system, any wastewater facility or any wastewater service of the authority. Any such contract or agreement may extend for any period not exceeding forty (40) years from the date thereof.

Any county, city or utility district seeking to enter into such agreement with the authority shall have the same rights and liabilities as it would otherwise have in entering into a similar agreement with a wastewater treatment authority as provided by title 68, chapter 221, part 6.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 13.

64-10-123. Authority deemed a local government unit.

For the purposes of this part, title 4, chapter 31, and title 68, chapter 221, the authority shall be deemed to be a local government unit and shall be eligible for the same grants, loans, and other assistance, and subject to the same obligations and requirements imposed by law related to such grants, loans, and assistance as any other local government unit.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 14.

64-10-124. Construction of part.

This part is remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed to effect its purpose of providing for a systematic and efficient means of the provision of wastewater services to the region served by the authority and the powers granted in this part may be exercised without regard to requirements, restrictions or procedural provisions contained in any other law or charter except as expressly provided in this part.

Acts 2011, ch. 419, § 15.